Alabama, session 2026rs, HB256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
14 Section 1. Sections 32-6-62 and 32-6-64, Code of
15 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
16 "§32-6-62
17 (a) Subject to subsection (b), all motor vehicle
18 license plate designs shall be valid for not less than five10
19 years. The Commissioner of Revenue, with the approval of the
20 License Plates Legislative Oversight Committee established by
21 Section 32-6-67, may authorize a license plate design to be
22 valid for more than five10 years.
23 (b) Subsection (a) shall not affect any law which
24 designates a license plate design to be permanent."
25 "§32-6-64
26 (a)(1) The design of license plates, including all
27 emblems, slogans, symbols, or characters appearing on the
28 plates, shall be, by rule, as adopted by the Commissioner of
Page 1

plates, shall be, by rule, as adopted by the Commissioner of
HB256 Engrossed
29 Revenue, and as otherwise specified by law. The face of the
30 license plate to be displayed shall be fully treated with a
31 reflective material which will increase the nighttime
32 visibility and legibility of the plate.
33 (2) Characters on the license plate which designate the
34 county of issuance shall be numeric, and all numerals on the
35 license plates shall be no smaller than two and three-fourths
36 inches in height. The following numbering scheme shall be
37 used:
38 a. Jefferson County, 1; Mobile County, 2; Montgomery
39 County, 3.
40 b. All other counties shall be ranked alphabetically
41 and assigned consecutive numbers beginning with 4 and
42 concluding with 67.
43 c. The Department of Revenue shall be responsible for
44 the numbering of distinctive license plates and shall
45 establish a system to minimize duplication of license plate
46 numbers. License plates that shall be approved for manufacture
47 under subsection (b) shall be numbered or personalized.
48 (b) The sponsoring organization of any new or reissued
49 distinctive license plate that is not of an in-state college
50 or in-state university as provided in subsection (b) of
51 Section 32-6-150, or the Alabama Gold Star Family license
52 plate as provided in Section 32-6-630 or a military or veteran
53 related category shall assure a minimum quantity of 250
54 registrations in order for the proposed plate to qualify for
55 production consideration by the legislative oversight
56 committee under the provisions of Section 32-6-67.
Page 2

committee under the provisions of Section 32-6-67.
HB256 Engrossed
57 (1) The procedure to assure the quantity minimum for a
58 distinctive license plate shall be as follows:
59 a. The sponsoring organization shall apply to the
60 Department of Revenue for approval for the proposed
61 distinctive license plate from the legislative oversight
62 committee. A sponsoring organization shall be limited to one
63 distinctive license plate design per application. At the time
64 of application, and upon payment of the application fee
65 required in paragraph b., if applicable, the sponsoring
66 organization shall submit a design for the plate or logo for
67 the quantity class being applied for as described below:
68 1. Quantity Class 1 (250 to 999 registrations). A new
69 distinctive license plate category, or an existing distinctive
70 license plate to be reissued, in which registrations are
71 estimated to be at least 250, but less than 1,000, shall be in
72 conformity with the design approved by the legislative
73 oversight committee for license plates in this quantity class.
74 This plate shall include a space designated on the left side
75 of the license plate, not exceeding two and one-half inches in
76 width and height, in which an appropriate emblem, slogan, or
77 logo design may be applied to represent the organization for
78 whom the distinctive license plate is issued. Each proposed
79 emblem, slogan, symbol, or logo shall be subject to the
80 approval of the legislative oversight committee.
81 2. Quantity Class 2 (1,000 or greater registrations).
82 This quantity class may use the logo system described for
83 Quantity Class 1, or may use a unique design for the entire
84 plate which is approved by the legislative oversight committee
Page 3

plate which is approved by the legislative oversight committee
HB256 Engrossed
85 and meets all other design and manufacture requirements of
86 Alabama law.
87 b. Effective January 1, 2022, each sponsoring
88 organization shall submit an application fee equal to the cost
89 of producing the distinctive license plate template not to
90 exceed one hundred dollars ($100) at the time the initial
91 application is made, the funds of which shall be distributed
92 by the Comptroller to the Department of Corrections to cover
93 the costs of producing the template of the distinctive license
94 plate for the sponsoring organization. On or before October 1,
95 2021, and by each October 1 thereafter, the Department of
96 Corrections shall certify the cost of production to the
97 legislative oversight committee for the subsequent calendar
98 year.
99 c. After the legislative oversight committee approval
100 and notification to the Department of Revenue, the department
101 shall also coordinate with the Comptroller to establish
102 funding procedures for depositing and maintaining monies held
103 pending issuance of the new category of license plates.
104 d. Each person desiring to register a vehicle in the
105 new category shall make application and shall remit, as a
106 commitment to purchase, the additional fee associated with the
107 license plate category in a manner as prescribed by rule of
108 the Commissioner of Revenue. Any credit card processing fee
109 associated with the transaction shall be paid by the person
110 making the commitment to purchase the distinctive license
111 plate and shall be nonrefundable.
112 e. The Department of Revenue shall deduct from the
Page 4

e. The Department of Revenue shall deduct from the
HB256 Engrossed
113 additional fee and retain a two and one-half percent
114 commission. The balance shall be forwarded to the Comptroller
115 to be retained in escrow, until such time as the revenue
116 received is equal to or greater than the minimum amount
117 required to issue license plates in that category. If, after
118 one year from the date of notification of approval by the
119 legislative oversight committee, the number of subscribers for
120 a category fails to reach 250 for Quantity Class 1, or fails
121 to reach 1,000 for Quantity Class 2, the Comptroller shall pay
122 the money in escrow to the sponsoring organization and no
123 further consideration for production of this proposed
124 distinctive plate shall be made under this application. In
125 addition, the sponsoring organization may not submit another
126 application for a distinctive license plate for a period of
127 one year from the date the commitment to purchase period
128 ended.
129 f. Upon determination by the Department of Revenue that
130 a sufficient number of applications for a plate category has
131 been received, the department shall initiate the ordering
132 processes for design and manufacture of the approved license
133 plate. At that time, the Comptroller shall pay out of the
134 escrow account the amounts referred to in Section 32-6-68.
135 (2) Notwithstanding any other provisions to the
136 contrary, except where specifically provided by this
137 subsection, no distinctive license plates shall be reissued
138 unless the following requirements are met:
139 a. For Quantity Class 1 distinctive license plates,
140 there shall have been issued in the prior license year a
Page 5

there shall have been issued in the prior license year a
HB256 Engrossed
141 minimum of 250 license plates.
142 b. For Quantity Class 2 distinctive license plates,
143 there shall have been issued in the prior license year a
144 minimum of 1,000 license plates.
145 (3) The use of distinctive license plate categories
146 shall be limited to use on passenger cars, pick-up trucks, and
147 self-propelled campers or house cars.
148 (c)(1) The Department of Corrections is directed to
149 supply all license plates and revalidation devices required
150 under this subdivision. The amounts charged by the Department
151 of Corrections for the manufacture of revalidation devices
152 shall not be less than that charged for the manufacture of
153 license plates on a per item basis.
154 (2) The Department of Corrections shall maintain an
155 accurate system of recordkeeping which shall trace and account
156 for the handling and distribution of each plate and
157 revalidation device throughout the manufacturing process until
158 the items are distributed to each county.
159 (d) After the five-year license plate has been in use
160 for a period of three years, the Department of Corrections may
161 manufacture all subsequent license plates for the remaining
162 two years of thevalidity period provided under Section 32-6-62
163 from a metal of less durability and quality than the metal
164 used initially in manufacturing the five-year license plates.
165 (e)(1) The department shall provide the owner or owners
166 of a motor vehicle who register a license plate provided in
167 this subsection the ability to opt-in to authorize the release
168 of certain personal information or to opt-out to restrict the
Page 6

of certain personal information or to opt-out to restrict the
HB256 Engrossed
169 release of certain personal information by the department to
170 the sponsoring organization, college, or university. The
171 license plates that shall be subject to the opt-in and opt-out
172 provisions are as follows:
173 a. A distinctive license plate issued pursuant to this
174 section.
175 b. A collegiate or university distinctive license plate
176 issued pursuant to Section 32-6-150.
177 c. Other distinctive license plates as authorized by
178 the legislative oversight committee.
179 (2) Each owner of the motor vehicle may designate his
180 or her consent through the opt-in authorization to release
181 certain personal information included within a motor vehicle
182 registration record to the sponsoring organization, college,
183 or university. The opt-in authorization shall be made at the
184 time of initial registration through the licensing official
185 for a license plate as specified in subdivision (1).
186 Subsequent opt-in authorizations shall be made directly to the
187 department. As used in this subsection, the term personal
188 information includes only the following information:
189 a. Owner name.
190 b. Owner address.
191 c. Owner email address, if applicable.
192 (3) Each owner of the motor vehicle may restrict the
193 release of personal information included within a motor
194 vehicle registration record for a license plate as specified
195 in subdivision (1) to the sponsoring organization, college, or
196 university by selecting to opt-out. The opt-out selection
Page 7

university by selecting to opt-out. The opt-out selection
HB256 Engrossed
197 shall be made directly to the department.
198 (4) The subsequent opt-in authorization provided in
199 subdivision (2) and opt-out selection provided in subdivision
200 (3) shall be made in a manner as prescribed by the department.
201 (5) The sponsoring organization of the distinctive
202 license plate or each college or university for which a
203 distinctive license plate has been issued may make an annual
204 request to the department for the listing of the owner
205 authorized opt-in disclosures. The sponsoring organization in
206 receipt of the listing shall be prohibited from the resale or
207 disclosure of the information to third parties without written
208 consent from the owner to whom the information pertains.
209 (f) All proposed distinctive license plates and the
210 continued issuance of all existing distinctive license plates
211 shall be subject to the approval and oversight of the
212 legislative oversight committee under Section 32-6-67 and this
213 section, except for the following:
214 (1) In-state collegiate or in-state university category
215 license plates.
216 (2) Military or veteran related category license
217 plates.
218 (3) Alabama Gold Star Family license plates as provided
219 in Section 32-6-630.
220 (g) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, no
221 distinctive license plate shall be issued after five
222 consecutive years in which the plate has not met the
223 requirements for reissuance provided in this section. This
224 subsection does not apply to military or veteran related
Page 8

subsection does not apply to military or veteran related
HB256 Engrossed
225 categories or Alabama Gold Star Family distinctive license
226 plates. The Commissioner of Revenue may require persons who
227 qualify for military and veteran related categories or Alabama
228 Gold Star Family distinctive license plates to be recertified
229 not more than every five years by providing the licensing
230 official with Form DD214 or any other documentation prescribed
231 by law or rule as evidence of qualification for the license
232 plate. In the event that Form DD214 or other qualifying
233 documentation prescribed by law or rule is unavailable, the
234 applicant shall provide the licensing official with a
235 certification of eligibility from the Department of Veterans
236 Affairs after the applicant provides that office with other
237 authoritative documentation evidencing eligibility for the
238 license plate.
239 (h) Any distinctive license plate not created pursuant
240 to this section shall be subject to the reissuance provisions
241 of this section and Section 32-6-62 unless specifically
242 exempted by law, provided the Alabama Gold Star Family
243 distinctive license plate design in effect on January 1, 2021,
244 shall not be subject to the redesign provisions of Section
245 32-6-62.
246 (i) The provisions in Act 2021-407 amending this
247 section shall not amend the distribution of the additional fee
248 associated with a distinctive license plate as provided in
249 Section 32-6-68 or as otherwise provided under Article 2 of
250 this chapter."
251 Section 2. This act shall become effective on January
252 1, 2027.
Page 9

1, 2027.
HB256 Engrossed
253
254
255 House of Representatives
256 Read for the first time and referred ................15-Jan-26
257 to the House of Representatives
258 committee on State Government
259
260 Read for the second time and placed ................21-Jan-26
261 on the calendar:
262 0 amendments
263
264 Read for the third time and passed ................05-Feb-26
265 as amended
266 Yeas 101
267 Nays 3
268 Abstains 0
269
270
271 John Treadwell
272 Clerk
273
Page 10